Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 26-16-501.
Incontestability and limitation of liability after reinstatement.

A reinstated life insurance policy or annuity contract may be contested because of fraud or misrepresentation of facts material to the reinstatement only for the same period following reinstatement and with the same conditions and exceptions as the policy provides for contestability after original issuance.

If any life insurance policy or annuity contract is reinstated, the reinstated policy or contract may exclude or restrict liability to the same extent that the liability could have been or was excluded or restricted when the policy or contract was originally issued. The exclusion or restriction is effective from the date of reinstatement.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 366; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-366; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-129; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-502.
Allocation to separate accounts to provide for life insurance or annuities; regulation of variable contracts.

A domestic life insurer may establish one (1) or more separate accounts and may allocate to those accounts amounts, including without limitation proceeds applied under optional modes of settlement or under dividend options, to provide for life insurance or annuities and benefits incidental thereto, payable in fixed or variable amounts or both, subject to the following:

The income and any gains and losses from assets allocated to a separate account shall be credited to or charged against the account, without regard to the insurer’s other income, gains or losses;

Except as may be provided with respect to reserves for guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in paragraph (iii) of this subsection, amounts allocated to any separate account and accumulations thereon may be invested and reinvested without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed by the laws of this state governing the investments of life insurance companies, and the investments in the separate accounts shall not be considered in applying the investment limitations otherwise applicable to the insurer’s investments;

Except with the commissioner’s approval and under conditions he prescribes as to investments and other matters, which conditions shall recognize the guaranteed nature of the benefits provided, reserves for benefits guaranteed as to dollar amount and duration and funds guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of interest shall not be maintained in a separate account;

Unless the commissioner otherwise approves:

Assets allocated to a separate account shall be valued at their market value on the date of valuation, or if there is no readily available market, then as provided under the terms of the contract or the rules or other written agreement applicable to the separate account;

The portion, if any, of the assets of the separate account which are equal to the insurer’s reserve liability with regard to the guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall be valued in accordance with the rules otherwise applicable to the insurer’s assets.

The insurer shall own amounts allocated to a separate account under this section and shall not be nor hold itself out to be a trustee with respect to those amounts;

If and to the extent provided under the applicable contracts, that portion of the assets of any separate account equal to the reserves and other contract liabilities with respect to the account are not chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the insurer conducts;

No insurer shall sell, exchange or otherwise transfer its assets between any of its separate accounts, or between any other investment account and one (1) or more of its separate accounts unless:

In case of a transfer into a separate account, the transfer is made solely to establish the account or to support the operation of the contracts with respect to the separate account to which the transfer is made;

The transfer, whether into or from a separate account, is made by a transfer of cash or by a transfer of securities having a readily determinable market value; and

The commissioner approves the transfer of securities, provided the commissioner may approve other transfers among the accounts if, in his opinion, the transfers are not inequitable.

To the extent deemed necessary to comply with any applicable federal or state laws, the insurer, with respect to any separate account, including without limitation any separate account which is a management investment company or a unit investment trust, may provide for persons having an interest therein appropriate voting and other rights and special procedures for the conduct of the business of the account, including special rights and procedures relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, selection of independent public accountants and the selection of a committee, the members of which need not be otherwise affiliated with the insurer, to manage the business of the account.

Any contract providing benefits payable in variable amounts delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall contain a statement of the essential features of the procedures the insurer is to follow in determining the dollar amount of the variable benefits. The contract under which the benefits vary to reflect investment experience, including a group contract and any certificate in evidence of variable benefits issued thereunder, shall state that the dollar amount will vary and shall contain on its first page a statement to the effect that the benefits thereunder are on a variable basis.

No insurer shall deliver or issue for delivery within this state variable contracts unless it is licensed to do a life insurance or annuity business in this state, and the commissioner is satisfied that its condition or method of operation in connection with the issuance of the contracts will not render its operation hazardous to the public or its policyholders in this state. In this connection, the commissioner shall consider among other things:

The insurer’s history and financial condition;

The character, responsibility and fitness of the insurer’s officers and directors; and

The law and regulation under which the insurer is authorized in the state of domicile to issue variable contracts. The state of entry of an alien insurer is its place of domicile for this purpose. If the insurer is a subsidiary of an admitted life insurer, or affiliated with that insurer through common management or ownership, it may be deemed by the commissioner to have met the provisions of this subsection if either it or the parent or the affiliated insurer meets the requirements thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner has sole authority to:

Regulate the issuance and sale of variable contracts; and

Issue reasonable rules and regulations appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

Except for W.S. 26-16-117(a), (b) and (g),

26-16-118

and article 2 of this chapter in the case of a variable annuity contract and W.S.

26-16-103

,

26-16-108

through

26-16-110

,

26-16-201

through

26-16-212

and

26-17-111

in the case of a variable life insurance contract and except as otherwise provided in this section, all pertinent provisions of this code [title 26] apply to separate accounts and contracts relating thereto. Any individual variable life insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall contain grace, reinstatement and nonforfeiture provisions appropriate to the contract. Any individual variable annuity contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall contain grace and reinstatement provisions appropriate to the contract. Any group variable life insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in this state shall contain a grace provision appropriate to the contract. The reserve liability for variable contracts shall be established in accordance with actuarial procedures that recognize the variable nature of the benefits provided and any mortality guarantees.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 367; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-367; Laws 1973, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-130; Laws 1981, ch. 121, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to investments of insurance companies generally, see §§

26-7-101

through

26-7-116

.

§ 26-16-503.
Insurer issuing participating and nonparticipating policies; records.

Any life insurer issuing both participating and nonparticipating policies shall maintain any accounting records necessary for it to determine dividends to participating policyholders on an equitable basis.

In the accounting records the insurer shall make a reasonable allocation as between participating and nonparticipating policies of the expenses of the general operations or functions as are jointly shared. Any allocation of expense as between categories shall be made upon a reasonable basis, to the end that each category shall bear a just portion of joint expense involved in the administration of the business of that category.

No policy shall provide for and no life insurer or representative shall knowingly offer or promise payment, credit, or distribution of participating “dividends”, “earnings”, “profits” or “savings”, by whatever name called, to participating policies out of the profits, earnings or savings on nonparticipating policies. This provision does not restrict the generality of W.S.

26-13-110

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 368; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-368; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-131; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-504.
Policy plans prohibited.

No life insurer shall deliver or issue for delivery in this state:

As part of or in combination with any life insurance, endowment or annuity contract, any agreement or plan, additional to the rights, dividends and benefits arising out of the contract, which provides for the accumulation of profits over a period of years and for payment of any of the accumulated profits only to members or policyholders of a designated group or class who continue as members or policyholders until the end of a specified or ascertainable period of years;

Any policy purporting to be “registered” or otherwise specially recorded with any agency of the state of Wyoming, or of any other state, or with any bank, trust company, escrow company or other institution other than the insurer or purporting that any reserves, assets or deposits are held for the special benefit or protection of the holder of the policy by or through the agency or institution;

Any policy or contract under which any part of the premium or of funds or values arising from the policy or contract or from investment of reserves, mortality savings, lapses or surrenders, in excess of the normal reserves or amounts required to pay death, endowment and nonforfeiture benefits in amounts as specified in or pursuant to the policy or contract, are on a basis not involving insurance or life contingency features to be placed in special funds, segregated accounts or specially designated places or to be invested in specially designated investments or types thereof, and the funds or earnings thereon to be divided among the holders of the policies or contracts, or their beneficiaries or assignees;

Any policy providing for the segregation of policyholders into mathematical groups and providing benefits for a surviving policyholder arising out of the death of another policyholder of the group, or under any other similar plan;

Any policy providing benefits or values for surviving or continuing policyholders contingent upon the lapse or termination, for any reason, of the policies of other policyholders;

Any policy containing or referring to:

Investment returns or profit-sharing, other than as a participation in the insurer’s divisible surplus under a regular participation provision as provided for in W.S.

26-16-107

;

Special treatment in the determination of any dividend that may be paid as to the policy;

Premiums as “deposits”;

Policyholder interest or returns to those of stockholders;

The policyholder as a member of a select group who is entitled to extra benefits or extra dividends not available to policyholders generally;

Any label, name or description of the policy as a “founders”, “charter” or “coupon” policy, or name of similar connotation.

Any policy which in addition to basic life insurance benefits provides for or is combined with a series of coupons, or with a passbook or other device generally associated with securities investments, or with savings, banking or investment institutions.

This section does not prohibit the provision, payment, allowance or apportionment of dividends or “savings” under regular participating forms of policies or contracts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 369; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-369; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-132; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-505.
Unclaimed life insurance benefits.

An insurer shall perform a comparison of its insureds’ policies and retained asset accounts against a death master file on at least a semi-annual basis by using the full death master file once and thereafter using the death master file update files for future comparisons in order to identify potential matches of its insureds.

Not later than ninety (90) days after a death master file match an insurer shall:

Complete and document a good faith effort to confirm the death of the insured or retained asset account holder against other available records and information; and

Determine whether benefits are due in accordance with the applicable policy. If benefits are due in accordance with the applicable policy the insurer shall complete and document good faith efforts to locate the beneficiary. The insurer shall also provide the appropriate claims forms or instructions to the beneficiary to make a claim including the need to provide an official death certificate, if applicable under the policy.

With respect to group life insurance, an insurer shall confirm the possible death of an insured pursuant to paragraph (b)(i) of this section when the insurer maintains at least the following information on those covered under a policy:

Social security number or name and date of birth;

Beneficiary designation;

Coverage eligibility;

Benefit amount; and

Premium payment status.

Every insurer shall implement procedures to account for all of the following:

Common nicknames, initials used in lieu of a first or middle name, use of a middle name, compound first and middle names and interchanged first and middle names;

Compound last names, maiden or married names and hyphens, blank spaces or apostrophes in last names;

Transposition of the month and date within a date of birth;

Incomplete social security numbers.

To the extent permitted by law, an insurer may disclose minimum necessary personal information about the insured or beneficiary to a person whom the insurer reasonably believes may be able to assist the insurer in locating the beneficiary.

An insurer or its service provider shall not charge any beneficiary or other authorized representative for any fees or costs associated with a death master file search or verification of a death master file match conducted pursuant to this section.

Benefits due and owing from a policy or a retained asset account, plus any applicable accrued contractual interest, shall first be payable to the designated beneficiary. If the beneficiary cannot be found, the insurer shall comply with the applicable provisions of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. Interest otherwise payable as required by law shall not be considered unclaimed property pursuant to W.S. 34-24-120(a).

Once benefits and accrued contractual interest are presumed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-108

, the insurer shall notify the state treasurer, as part of the report sent under W.S.

34-24-118

, that:

A beneficiary has not submitted a claim with the insurer; and

The insurer has complied with this section and has been unable, after good faith efforts documented by the insurer, to contact the beneficiary.

Failure to meet any requirement of this section may constitute an unfair trade practice and is subject to the penalty provided in W.S.

26-1-107

.

As used in this section:

“Death master file” means the United States social security administration’s death master file or any other database or service that is at least as comprehensive as the United States social security administration’s death master file for determining that a person has reportedly died;

“Death master file match” means a search of the death master file that results in a match of the social security number or the name and date of birth of an insured, annuity owner or retained asset account holder;

“Policy” means any policy or certificate of life insurance that provides a death benefit or any annuity contract, except that the term shall not include:

Any policy or certificate of life insurance that provides a death benefit under an employee benefit plan that is:

Subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974; or

Part of a federal employee benefit program.

Any policy or certificate of life insurance that is used to fund a prearranged funeral contract;

Any policy or certificate of credit life or accidental death insurance;

Any policy issued to a group master policyholder for which the insurer does not provide record keeping services; or

An annuity used to fund an employment based retirement plan or program if the insurer:

Does not perform the record keeping services; or

Is not committed by terms of the annuity contract to pay death benefits to the beneficiaries of specific plan participants.

“Record keeping services” means services provided by an insurer for a group policy customer pursuant to an agreement under which the insurer is responsible for obtaining, maintaining and administering, in its own or its agent’s systems, at least the following information about each individual insured under the group policy or a line of coverage thereunder:

Social security number or name and date of birth;

Beneficiary designation information;

Coverage eligibility;

Benefit amount; and

Premium payment status.

“Retained asset account” means any mechanism whereby the settlement of proceeds payable under a policy is accomplished by the insurer or an entity acting on behalf of the insurer depositing the proceeds into an account with check or draft writing privileges, where those proceeds are retained by the insurer or its agent, pursuant to a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits other than death benefits.

History.

2019 ch. 169, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date.—

Laws 2019, ch. 169 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.